Alabama, session 2026rs, HB51.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
48 Section 1. Sections 13A-6-21 and 13A-11-8, Code of
49 Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
50 "§13A-6-21
51 (a) A person commits the crime of assault in the second
52 degree if the person does any of the following:
53 (1) With intent to cause serious physical injury to
54 another personindividual, he or she causes serious physical
55 injury to any personindividual.
56 (2) With intent to cause physical injury to another
Page 2

(2) With intent to cause physical injury to another
HB51 INTRODUCED
57 personindividual, he or she causes physical injury to any
58 person individual by means of a deadly weapon or a dangerous
59 instrument.
60 (3) He or she recklessly causes serious physical injury
61 to another person individual by means of a deadly weapon or a
62 dangerous instrument.
63 (4)a. With intent to prevent a peace officer, as
64 defined in Section 36-21-60, a detention or correctional
65 officer at any municipal or county jail or state penitentiary,
66 emergency medical personnel, a utility worker, or a
67 firefighter any of the following from performing a lawful
68 duty, he or she intends to cause physical injury and he or she
69 causes physical injury to any person.individual:
70 a. A peace officer, as defined in Section 36-21-60.
71 b. A detention or correctional officer at any municipal
72 or county jail or state penitentiary.
73 c. An emergency medical service personnel.
74 d. A utility worker.
75 e. A firefighter.
76 b. For the purpose of this subdivision, a person who is
77 a peace officer who is employed or under contract while off
78 duty by a private or public entity is a peace officer
79 performing a lawful duty when the person is working in his or
80 her approved uniform while off duty with the approval of his
81 or her employing law enforcement agency. Provided, however,
82 that nothing contained in this subdivision shall be deemed or
83 construed as amending, modifying, or extending the
84 classification of a peace officer as off-duty for workers'
Page 3

classification of a peace officer as off-duty for workers'
HB51 INTRODUCED
85 compensation purposes or any other benefits to which a peace
86 officer may otherwise be entitled to under law when considered
87 on-duty. Additionally, nothing contained in this subdivision
88 shall be deemed or construed as amending, modifying, or
89 extending the tort liability of any municipality as a result
90 of any action or inaction on the part of an off-duty police
91 officer.
92 (5) With intent to cause physical injury to a teacher
93 or to an employee of a public educational institution during
94 or as a result of the performance of his or her the teacher's
95 or employee's duty, he or she causes physical injury to any
96 personindividual.
97 (6) With intent to cause physical injury to a health
98 care worker, including a nurse, physician, technician, or any
99 other person employed by or practicing at a hospital as
100 defined in Section 22-21-20; a county or district health
101 department; a long-term care facility; a physician's office,
102 clinic, or outpatient treatment facility during the course of
103 or as a result of the performance of the duties of the health
104 care worker or other person employed by or practicing at the
105 hospital; the county or district health department; any health
106 care facility owned or operated by the State of Alabama; the
107 long-term care facility; the physician's office, clinic, or
108 outpatient treatment facility; or a pharmacist, pharmacy
109 technician, pharmacy intern, pharmacy extern, or pharmacy
110 cashier;, he or she causes physical injury to any
111 personindividual. This subdivision shall apply to assaults on
112 home health care workers while they are in a private
Page 4

home health care workers while they are in a private
HB51 INTRODUCED
113 residence. This subdivision shall not apply to assaults by
114 patients who are impaired by medication.
115 (7) For a purpose other than lawful medical or
116 therapeutic treatment, he or she intentionally causes stupor,
117 unconsciousness, or other physical or mental impairment or
118 injury to another person individual by administering to him or
119 her, without his or her consent, a drug, substance, or
120 preparation capable of producing the intended harm.
121 (8) With intent to cause physical injury to a
122 Department of Human Resources employee or any employee
123 performing social work, as defined in Section 34-30-1, during
124 or as a result of the performance of his or her the employee's
125 duty, he or she causes physical injury to any
126 personindividual.
127 (9) With intent to cause physical injury to a letter
128 carrier, as defined in Section 32-6-380, during or as a result
129 of the performance of his or her the letter carrier's duty, he
130 or she causes physical injury to any personindividual.
131 (10) With intent to cause physical injury to a current
132 or former public official, as defined in Section 36-25-1,
133 during or as a result of the performance of the current or
134 former public official's duty, he or she causes physical
135 injury to any individual.
136 (b) Assault in the second degree is a Class C felony.
137 (c)(1)a. For the purposes of this section, a peace
138 officer who is employed or under contract while off duty by a
139 private or public entity is a peace officer performing a
140 lawful duty while off duty with the approval of his or her
Page 5

lawful duty while off duty with the approval of his or her
HB51 INTRODUCED
141 employing law enforcement agency.
142 b. Nothing in this section may be construed to amend,
143 modify, or extend the classification of a peace officer as off
144 duty for workers' compensation purposes or any other benefits
145 to which a peace officer may otherwise be entitled under law
146 when considered off duty.
147 c. Nothing in this section may be construed to amend,
148 modify, or extend the tort liability of any county or
149 municipality related to any action or inaction by an off-duty
150 peace officer.
151 (2) For the purposes of this section, "utility worker"
152 means any person individual who is employed by an entity that
153 owns, operates, leases, or controls any plant, property, or
154 facility for the generation, transmission, manufacture,
155 production, supply, distribution, sale, storage, conveyance,
156 delivery, or furnishing to or for the public of electricity,
157 natural or manufactured gas, water, steam, sewage, or
158 telephone service, including two or more utilities rendering
159 joint service.
160 (3) For purposes of this section, "health care worker"
161 means any individual employed by or practicing at any of the
162 following:
163 a. A hospital as defined in Section 22-21-20.
164 b. A county or district health department.
165 c. A long-term care facility.
166 d. A physician's office, clinic, or outpatient
167 treatment facility.
168 (d)(1) Subdivision (a)(6) shall apply to assaults on
Page 6

(d)(1) Subdivision (a)(6) shall apply to assaults on
HB51 INTRODUCED
169 home health care workers while they are in a private
170 residence.
171 (2) Subdivision (a)(6) shall not apply to assaults by
172 patients who are impaired by medication."
173 "§13A-11-8
174 (a)(1) HARASSMENT. A person commits the crime of
175 harassment if, with intent to harass, annoy, or alarm another
176 personindividual, he or she eitherdoes either of the
177 following:
178 a. Strikes, shoves, kicks, or otherwise touches a
179 person any individual or subjects him or her any individual to
180 physical contact.
181 b. Directs abusive or obscene language or makes an
182 obscene gesture towards toward another personindividual.
183 (2) For purposes of this section, harassment shall
184 include a threat, verbal or nonverbal, made with the intent to
185 carry out the threat, that would cause a reasonable person
186 individual who is the target of the threat to fear for his or
187 her safety.
188 (3) Harassment is a Class C misdemeanor.
189 (b)(1) HARASSING COMMUNICATIONS. A person commits the
190 crime of harassing communications if, with intent to harass or
191 alarm another personindividual, he or she does any of the
192 following:
193 a. Communicates with a personany individual,
194 anonymously or otherwise, by telephone, telegraph, mail, or
195 any other form of written or electronic communication, in a
196 manner likely to harass or cause alarm.
Page 7

manner likely to harass or cause alarm.
HB51 INTRODUCED
197 b. Makes a telephone call, whether or not a
198 conversation ensues, with no purpose of legitimate
199 communication.
200 c. Telephones another person individual and addresses
201 to or about such the other person individual any lewd or
202 obscene words or language.
203 Nothing in this section shall apply to legitimate
204 business telephone communications.
205 (2) Harassing communications is a Class C misdemeanor.
206 (c) If a person commits a violation of subsection (a)
207 or (b), and the victim is a public official, as defined in
208 Section 36-25-1, the person is guilty of a Class B
209 misdemeanor.
210 (d) Nothing in this section shall apply to legitimate
211 business telephone communications."
212 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
213 1, 2026.
Page 8